Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-287
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of sections 67-280 to 67-286.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 55.